California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(b) If the position of veterans service officer is created and filled, the compensation and expenses of the county veterans service office shall be a county charge, but the Department of Veterans Affairs, out of state moneys available therefor, shall pay each county a portion of those costs in an amount determined by the department, conditioned upon the observance of standards and regulations adopted by, and in compliance with the direction of, the department and its authorized representatives.

(c) State money available for paying counties any portion of the cost of the compensation and expenses of county veterans service offices shall not include any funds of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1274, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

972.1.

(a) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs for allocation, during the 1989–90 fiscal year, for purposes of funding the activities of county veterans service officers pursuant to this section. Funds for allocation in future years shall be as provided in the annual Budget Act.

(b) Funds shall be disbursed each fiscal year on a pro rata basis to counties that have established and maintain a county veterans service officer in accordance with the staffing level and workload of each county veterans service officer under a formula based upon performance that shall be developed by the Department of Veterans Affairs for these purposes, and that shall allocate county funds in
 any fiscal year for county veterans service officers in an amount not less than the amount allocated in the 1988–89 fiscal year.

(c) The department shall annually determine the amount of new or increased monetary benefits paid to eligible veterans by the federal government attributable to the assistance of county veterans service officers. The department shall, on or before October 1 of each year, prepare and transmit its determination for the preceding fiscal year to the Department of Finance and the Legislature. The Department of Finance shall review the department’s determination in time to use the information in the annual Budget Act for the budget of the department for the next fiscal year.

(d) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that 50 percent of the amount annually budgeted for county veterans service officers is approximately eleven million
 dollars ($11,000,000). The Legislature further finds and declares that it is an efficient and reasonable use of state funds to increase the annual budget for county veterans service officers if it is justified by the monetary benefits to the state’s veterans attributable to the effort of these officers.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature, after reviewing the department’s determination in subdivision (c), to consider an increase in the annual budget for county veterans service officers in an amount not to exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000), if the monetary benefits to the state’s veterans attributable to the assistance of county veteran service officers justify that increase in the budget.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 694, Sec. 1.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

972.2.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Veterans Service Office Fund.

(b) Commencing January 1, 1995, the Veterans Service Office Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Veterans Affairs for allocation and disbursement to counties for the operation of county veterans service offices.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, that revenues from the special interest license plate fees for license plates issued pursuant to Article 8.1 (commencing with Section 5025) of Chapter 1 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, and deposited in the Veterans Service Office Fund, shall be used to expand the support of county veterans service offices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1274, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

972.5.

(a) The Department of Veterans Affairs may enter into an agreement with the State Department of Health Services and the State Department of Social Services for purposes of obtaining federal matching funds for the Department of Veterans Affairs to contribute toward the salaries and expenses of county veteran service officers for their activities which are reasonably related to the programs of the State Department of Health Services and the State Department of Social Services which are benefited, or realize cost avoidance, as a result of the services of those officers.

(b) At such time as the United States Department of Health and Human Services makes available additional federal financial participation, the State Department of Social Services may enter into an agreement with the Department of Veterans Affairs for those county veteran service officers’ activities specified in subdivision (a). Such an agreement shall have no adverse impact on the General Fund. 

(c) The sums obtained each fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be disbursed by the Department of Veterans Affairs to counties for payment of salaries and expenses of county veteran service officers. The Department of Veterans Affairs shall make the disbursement to a county on a pro rata basis in accordance with the actual workload of each county veteran service officer under a formula based on performance to be developed by the Department of Veterans Affairs for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 474, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

973.

The county veteran service officer shall have power to administer and certify oaths and affirmations, take and certify affidavits and acknowledgments, and exercise any other power of a notary public, as a part of his duties under the provisions of this chapter in assisting veterans with respect to their affairs. The county veteran service officer shall not charge any fee for such service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------

974.

(a) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall annually prepare a report of the activities of county veterans service officers, and may require each county veterans service officer to submit information required to prepare the report. The report shall include the following:

(1) The number of veterans and their family members who have contacted or utilized the services of the county veterans service offices during the fiscal year.

(2) The number of claims filed to achieve benefits such as pension, disability compensation, and health care on behalf of veterans and their dependents.

(3) The annualized monetary value of benefits received by
 veterans and their dependents as a result of the efforts of county veterans service offices, broken down by type of benefit.

(4) A summary of other services provided by county veterans service offices and special events and activities in which county veterans service offices participated, such as veterans outreach events, homeless veteran “Stand Downs,” and job fairs for veterans.

(5) The composition of the county office, including the number of staff, and how many are administrative, clerical, or directly supporting claims filed on behalf of veterans.

(6) The annual funding of the county veterans service office by the county,
 including year-to-year changes and funding over the previous five years.

(b) The information required to be included in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be set forth for each county together with a statewide total.

(c) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may require county veterans service officers to apply uniform measurement and workload units, claims, and other information required by the department under this section.

(d) The department shall transmit a copy of the report to the Department of Finance, the State Department of Health Care Services, the California Veterans Board, and to each Member of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 694, Sec. 2.   (AB 1566)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

974.5.

(a) The purpose of this section is to provide a mechanism to facilitate the delivery of complete, efficient information and other services to veterans in a convenient setting.

(b) By July 1, 1999, the Department of Veterans Affairs and the Department of Employment Development may enter into interagency agreements with individual counties that elect to participate in the program pursuant to this section, after a determination that services to be provided pursuant to this
 section are not otherwise being provided and would, thus, not be duplicated. Services provided pursuant to this section shall not be contrary to the purposes of, nor shall they be in conflict with, any one-stop service program provided under federal guidelines. Pursuant to the agreements the departments may agree to provide resources and staff, or both, as necessary to locate within a single facility owned by the participating county, under the coordination of the county veteran service director, a more complete and convenient local service program for veterans.

(c) The veteran service center shall be staffed with persons knowledgeable in employment and veterans benefits issues, and shall contain all necessary resources, information, forms, and other materials necessary for a veteran to receive full employment assistance and a
 complete assessment of veterans benefits to which they are entitled.

(d) The Department of Veterans Affairs and the Department of Employment Development, after consulting with participating counties, shall jointly report to the Legislature by January 1, 2002, regarding the progress of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 74.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Veterans’ Affairs Commissions [975. - 975.5.]

975.

The board of supervisors of any county may create and appoint members to a veterans’ affairs commission either as an independent agency or in conjunction with a California National Guard members’ commission or a veterans’ memorial commission, or in any combination of these commissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

975.5.

(a) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide for one paid veterans assistant position within the office of the county veteran service officer for the County of Los Angeles. The department shall establish one similar position for the County of San Diego and one similar position for the City and County of San Francisco.

(b) The veterans assistants employed under subdivision (a) shall conduct outreach programs in order to make veterans aware of readjustment counseling services and alcohol and drug abuse programs offered by community-based organizations and city, county, and federal agencies. The veterans assistants shall advise and counsel veterans concerning readjustment counseling programs and refer veterans to appropriate community-based or city, county, or federal counseling programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 372, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. State Benefits for Veterans [980. - 999.80.]



  ARTICLE 1. Veterans [980. - 980.5.]

980.

(a) As used in this chapter, “veteran” means any of the following:

(1) A citizen of the United States who served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States on or after April 6, 1917, and prior to November 12, 1918, and who received an honorable discharge or was released from active duty under honorable conditions.

(2) A
 person who did all of the following:

(A) Served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States for a period of not less than 90 consecutive days or was discharged from the service due to a service-connected disability within that 90-day period.

(B) Received an honorable discharge or was released from active duty under honorable conditions.

(C) Performed any portion of that service during any of the following periods:

(i) On or after December 7, 1941, and prior to January 1, 1947, including, but not limited to, members of the Philippine Commonwealth Army, the Regular Scouts (“Old Scouts”), and the Special Philippine Scouts (“New Scouts”).

(ii) On
 or after June 27, 1950, and prior to February 1, 1955.

(iii) On or after February 28, 1961, and prior to August 5, 1964, in the case of a veteran who served in the Republic of Vietnam during that period.

(iv) On or after August 5, 1964, and prior to May 8, 1975.

(v) On or after August 2, 1990, to and including the date on which the territories in and around the Arabian Peninsula cease to be designated as a place where the Armed Forces of the United States are engaged in combat, as described in Executive Order 12744 of the President of the United States. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this clause,
 that the benefits provided by this chapter shall be available to all veterans who were on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States or who were called to active duty in the reserves or National Guard during the pendency of the deployment of forces for Operation Desert Shield or Desert Storm, which resulted in Executive Order 12744, irrespective of whether these veterans served overseas or in the United States.

(vi) At any time, in a campaign or expedition for service in which a medal has been authorized by the government of the United States, regardless of the number of days served on active duty.

(vii) At any time in Somalia, or in direct support of the troops in
 Somalia, including, but not limited to, persons stationed on ships of the Armed Forces of the United States conducting support activities offshore in the vicinity of Somalia, during Operation Restore Hope, regardless of the number of days served.

(3) A member of the reserves or National Guard who does all the following:

(A) Is called to, and released from, active duty or active service, regardless of the number of days served.

(B) Is called during any period when a presidential executive order specifies the United States is engaged in combat or homeland defense.

(C) Has received an honorable discharge or was released from active duty or active service under honorable conditions.

(4) A person who did all of the following:

(A) Served in the Merchant Marine Service of the United States.

(B) Has been granted veteran status by the United States Secretary of Defense under Title IV of the GI Improvement Act of 1977 (Public Law
 95-202, as amended).

(5) A person who qualifies under federal laws for revenue bond or unrestricted funds (26 U.S.C. Sec. 143) and did all of the following:

(A) Served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States for a period of not less than 90 consecutive days.

(B) Received an honorable discharge or was released from active duty or active service under honorable conditions.

(6) A
 person who qualifies for funds made available from a qualified mortgage revenue bond issued pursuant to Section 143 of Title 26 of the United States Code and is, at the time of application for Cal-Vet benefits, a member of the California National Guard or a reserve component of any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who has enlisted or been commissioned in that service for a period of not less
 than six years and has completed a minimum of one year of satisfactory service, or who was a member of the California National Guard or a reserve component of any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States who has completed not less than a six-year commitment and was released under honorable conditions.

(b) For purposes of this chapter “veteran” does not include any of the following:

(1) A person who was separated from the Armed Forces
 under other than honorable conditions.

(2) A person who was separated from the Armed Forces on account of alienage.

(3) A person who performed no military duty whatever or refused to wear the uniform.

(4) A person who served only in an auxiliary or reserve component of the Armed Forces whose service therein did not provide an exemption from the operation of the
 federal Selective Training and Service Act of 1940 (Public Law 76-783: 54 Stat. 885, as amended).

(5) A person whose service with the Armed Forces was due to temporary active duty orders for the sole purpose of training duty, processing, or a physical examination, except as provided for in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a).

(6) A person whose only service was as a student at a military academy and who, for any reason, failed to complete the course
 of study and subsequently did not serve on active duty.

(c) For purposes of this section, “active duty” or “active service” is defined as provided in Section 101(d) of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

980.5.

In the event of any conflict between any provision of this chapter and the federal Mortgage Subsidy Bond Tax Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-499; 94 Stat. 2660), including any amendment thereto and any regulation issued thereunder, the department shall comply with that federal law or regulation and any other federal law or regulation to the extent necessary to maintain the tax-exempt status of any issue of general obligation or revenue bonds.

Any prior action of the department to effect that compliance is hereby confirmed and ratified, it having been at all times the intent of the Legislature that the tax-exempt status of
 those bonds be maintained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 416, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Educational Assistance [981. - 981.8.]

981.

There is in the state government an educational institution known as the California Veterans’ Educational Institute, which is under the management and control of the Department of Veterans Affairs. The purpose of the institute is to provide opportunities for veterans to continue their education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

981.1.

Any veteran who desires to continue his education may apply for admission to the institute and if, in the opinion of the department, the educational needs and desires of the veteran can be satisfactorily met, the department shall assume state wardship and supervision over the education of such veteran. The department may provide for such education in educational institutions in this State, or in other states, or in other countries, when necessary or desirable for postgraduate or professional college courses. The department may provide educational counsel for students and assist them in securing admission to suitable institutions of learning in either public or private school field. The department may assist any
 eligible veteran who may apply for a short intensive postgraduate or training or refresher course in any professional field where the purposes of such course are to prepare the veteran for a state examination which he must pass as a prerequisite to practice his profession in the State of California or where said course or courses will acquaint the veteran in professional techniques developed in private practice during the time that he was in the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2082.)
-------------------------------------------

981.15.

“Suitable institutions of learning,” as used in this article, includes postgraduate schools of colleges, universities, or other institutions of learning, but does not include educational institutions whose enrollment of students receiving federal or state veteran subsidy exceeds 85 percent of their total enrollment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 475.)
-------------------------------------------

981.2.

The department, insofar as the funds permit, may provide an allowance of one hundred dollars ($100) for each month the student is in satisfactory and actual full-time attendance at an educational institution, and pursuing a course of study leading to a bachelor of arts or bachelor of science degree, or to a recognized degree, license, certificate, or diploma.

For purposes of this
 section, the term “full-time attendance” shall be defined in the same manner as it is defined by the educational institution attended by the student. For purposes of this section, “educational institution” shall be defined as any school or college of the collegiate level accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges, including a community college, and shall include a vocational school or any other school approved by the State Department of Education for the purpose of receipt by a student of educational benefits afforded by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

The department may provide for such educational benefits for full-time students pursuing a course of study leading to a recognized postgraduate or professional degree, license, certificate, or diploma in educational institutions in other states or in other countries when such course of study is otherwise unavailable to the student.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 186, Sec. 7.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

981.3.

The amount expended on account of any one veteran under this article shall not exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200). Eligibility for benefits conferred under this article shall not be granted if either the student has not exhausted their rights to educational benefits afforded by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or four years have elapsed from termination of educational benefits afforded by the United States
 Department of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 75.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

981.4.

The department shall consider the application of veterans for admission to the institute in the order in which they are received. If the funds available are insufficient to meet the obligations which would arise from the guardianship of all worthy applicants, the department shall assume wardship over such veterans as are most urgently in need of further education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

981.5.

The department may co-operate and confer with authorized agencies of the United States in carrying out the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

981.6.

No veteran who is receiving federal educational benefits shall be eligible to receive the educational benefits provided by this article during such time that he is receiving federal educational benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------

981.7.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as repealing the provisions of Chapter 579, Statutes of 1921, appropriating money for educational assistance to veterans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

981.8.

(a) The Office of the Adjutant General is requested to annually make all of the following available to each member of the California National Guard, the State Guard, and the Naval Militia who does not have a baccalaureate degree:

(1) A copy of the enrollment fee waiver application of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(2) A copy of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA).

(3) A copy of the latest brochure or information relative to the current federal Post-9/11 GI Bill.

(4) A copy of the latest brochure or information relative to the California National Guard Education Assistance Award Program.

(5) The contact information for a County Veterans Service Officer or the division responsible within the California Department of Veterans Affairs for higher education or the California National Guard.

(b) The Office of the Adjutant General is requested to provide assistance as necessary to help the members complete the forms made available to them under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 44.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.1. Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 [987.50. - 987.93.]

987.50.

This article may be cited as the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974, also known as the CalVet Home Loan Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 4.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.51.

The object of this article is to provide veterans with the opportunity to acquire farms and homes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.52.

The provisions of this article are applicable, and the benefits conferred thereby are available, to:

(a) Any veteran as defined in Section 980;

(b) Any person who is on active duty in the military or naval service of the United States, whose service may or may not have been continuous, and who is in all other respects qualified pursuant to Section 980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.53.

As used in this article:

(a) “Farm” means a tract of land, which, in the opinion of the department, is capable of producing sufficient income to provide payment of the amortized contract installments, including principal, interest, and taxes.

(b) “Home” means a parcel of real estate upon which there is a dwelling house and other buildings that will, in the sole opinion of the department, meet or exceed industry health and safety standards. “Home” includes all of the following:

(1) A condominium as defined in subdivision (h).

(2) A mobilehome as defined in subdivision (k).

(3) A residence with two to four units, inclusive, that satisfies the requirements of Section 143(k)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code where at least one unit is occupied by a veteran and their family.

(4) A cooperative dwelling unit as defined in subdivision (s).

(c) “Purchaser” means a veteran or any person who has entered into a contract of purchase of a farm or home from the department.

(d) “Purchase price” means the price that is paid for the acquisition of any farm or home.

(e) “Selling price” means the price for which any farm or home is sold.

(f) “Initial payment” means the first payment to be made by a purchaser to the
 department or the seller for a farm or home.

(g) “Progress payment plan” means payment by the department for improvements on real property in installments as work progresses.

(h) “Condominium” means an estate in real property consisting of an undivided interest in common in a portion of a parcel of real property together with a separate interest in space in a residential building on the real property, such as an apartment, which, in the sole opinion of the department, meets minimum property standards as defined by the department. A condominium may include, in addition, a separate interest in other portions of the property.

(i) “Effective rate of interest” means the average rate of interest on the unpaid balance due on a participation contract to which the department’s legal rights are subject, and the rate of
 interest on the unpaid balance of the purchase price, as determined by the department.

(j) “Participation contract” means an obligation secured by a deed of trust or mortgage, or other security interest, to include, but not be limited to, mortgage-backed securities, established pursuant to regulations of the department.

(k) “Mobilehome” means either a parcel of real estate, or an undivided interest in common in a portion of a parcel of real property, on which is sited one or more mobilehome modules, or a site in a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, on which one or more mobilehome modules are sited or are to be sited that will, in the sole opinion of the department, meet minimum property standards as defined by the department and meet all requirements of local governmental jurisdictions. However, where the mobilehome module or modules are
 sited on trust land, “local governmental jurisdictions” means the tribal governing body.

For purposes of this subdivision, “module” means a section of a mobilehome at least 10 feet wide and at least 40 feet long.

(l) “Indian veteran” means a veteran, as defined in Section 980, who, in addition, either belongs to an Indian tribe, band, group, reservation, rancheria, or community which is recognized by the United States as eligible for services from the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs or is an Indian beneficiary and who is eligible under this article for purchase by the department of a home or farm sited on trust land.

(m) “Trust land,” with respect to an Indian veteran, means land held in trust by the United States government for individual Indians, Indians who belong to Indian tribes, or Indian tribes.

(n) “Allotment trust land” means land held by the United States under the Indian General Allotment Act of 1887, as amended, (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 331) of Title 25 of the United States Code), in trust for an individual Indian or for two or more Indians holding individual interests in common. It includes both trust and restricted public domain allotments and allotments within the boundaries of an Indian reservation.

(o) “Tribal trust land” means land held in trust by the United States for an Indian tribe or band.

(p) “Tribe” means any Indian tribe, band, group, reservation, rancheria, or community which is recognized by the United States as eligible for services from the United States Bureau of Indian Affairs.

(q) “Immediate family” means the
 spouse or registered domestic partner of a purchaser, the natural or adopted dependent children of the purchaser, and the parents of the purchaser if they are dependent on the purchaser for 50 percent or more of their support.

(r) “Indian beneficiary” means an Indian for whom land is held in trust by the United States government.

(s) “Cooperative dwelling unit” means a unit in a development owned by a stock cooperative as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 1351 of the Civil Code, including a limited-equity housing cooperative as defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code, or similar entity, the exclusive occupancy of which is established in accordance with cooperative dwelling unit ownership documents.

(t) “Cooperative dwelling unit ownership documents” means cooperative housing stock together with any occupancy
 agreements or similar arrangements between the stock company and the owner of the cooperative housing stock. The cooperative dwelling unit ownership documents for a cooperative dwelling unit shall have terms that are acceptable to the department to allow the department to protect its rights under the applicable contract of purchase.

(u) “Cooperative housing stock” means a certificate of stock, a certificate of membership, or other evidence of ownership of an interest, in a stock cooperative as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 1351 of the Civil Code, including a limited-equity housing cooperative as defined in Section 817 of the Civil Code, or similar entity that entitles the purchaser to enter into occupancy agreements or similar arrangements with the stock cooperative, including a limited-equity housing cooperative, or similar entity, to occupy a cooperative dwelling unit.

(v) “Property,” except when used in the phrase “real property” or “personal property,” means a farm or a home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 5.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.54.

The administration of the provisions of this article is vested solely in the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.55.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations in keeping with the purpose of this article to establish preferences in the granting of benefits conferred by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1477.)
-------------------------------------------

987.56.

(a) The department shall prescribe and determine the eligibility and qualifications of all veterans. Any person deeming themselves a veteran and desiring to benefit hereunder, shall submit to the department information, in the form prescribed by the department, that will enable the department to determine their eligibility and qualifications. The department may make further inquiries and investigations in order to determine eligibility and qualifications.

(b) Whenever the department determines that a shortage of funds exists in any of the funding sources available, the department shall use the following preference categories for the use of those funds.

(1) Veterans who are otherwise qualified because of service during a time of war and who were wounded or disabled as a result of their service shall be given first preference in the benefits conferred by this article. The department shall determine, in each case, whether the veteran was wounded or disabled as a result of service.

(2) The following group shall be given second preference in the benefits conferred by this article:

(A) The unremarried spouse or registered domestic partner of individuals who were members of the Armed Forces on active military duty and were killed in the line of duty while on active duty.

(B) Members of the Armed Forces who were held as prisoners of war.

(C) The unremarried spouse or registered domestic partner
 of members of the Armed Forces who have been designated by the Armed Forces as missing in action.

(3) Veterans whose eligibility is derived from service any portion of which was on or after August 2, 1990, and prior to a date to be set by law or by a Presidential proclamation ending the Gulf War, and veterans with wartime service discharged or released from active duty within 10 years of their application to the department shall be given third preference in the benefits conferred by this article.

(4) Active members of the California National Guard or a reserve component of a branch of the United States Armed Forces who meet the eligibility criteria of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 980 shall be given fourth preference in the benefits conferred by this article.

(5) Veterans with wartime service discharged
 or released from active duty more than 10 years prior to their application to the department shall be given fifth preference in the benefits conferred by this article.

(6) Veterans who are otherwise qualified and whose only military service was during a time of peace shall be given sixth preference for the benefits conferred by this article.

(7) Veterans eligible for a subsequent loan under subdivision (a) of Section 987.86 shall be given seventh preference in the benefits conferred by this article.

(c) Nothing in this section regarding preferences shall affect any eligibility requirement for benefits conferred by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 6.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.566.

Whenever applications exceed the amount of funds available in any one or more of the available funding categories, the department may establish a date for each funding category so as to provide funding to veterans whose applications were filed on or before that date, and whose applications are subsequently approved, before funding is made available to those whose applications are filed after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 465, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

987.57.

(a) The department shall require that all applicants under this article qualify under applicable federal laws and regulations governing the permitted uses of tax-exempt bond funds, and file within the time limits required under applicable federal law and regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, no time limit for filing shall be imposed upon any veterans who served in the Philippine Commonwealth Army, or the Regular Scouts (“Old Scouts”), or the Special Philippine Scouts (“New Scouts”) during World War II, except as required by federal law.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, the department shall
 require all applicants whose loans would be funded from sources other than tax-exempt bond funds, including, but not limited to, mortgage-backed securities, to qualify under the applicable federal laws and regulations governing the source of funds, whether taxable or tax exempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 549, Sec. 7.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

987.58.

(a) If a veteran dies after filing an application for purchase of a farm or a home, and the veteran’s eligibility and qualifications are subsequently approved, the veteran’s surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner may, in the discretion of the department, succeed to the veteran’s rights under the application, and may succeed to the veteran’s rights, privileges, and benefits under this article. The contract of purchase that the department otherwise would have made with
 the deceased veteran may be made with the surviving spouse or domestic partner.

(b) If a person was a member of the Armed Forces on active military duty, entered active duty while in the State of California and lived in this state for six months immediately preceding entry into active duty, and was killed in the line of duty while on active duty or died after discharge from active duty from injuries incurred in the line of duty while on active duty, that person is a veteran for purposes of this article, and their unremarried surviving
 spouse, or surviving domestic partner who has not remarried or entered into a domestic partnership with another person, may file an application, is entitled to the same rights, privileges, and benefits for which the Armed Forces member would have been eligible, and may contract with the department pursuant to subdivision (a). In making a determination of eligibility under this subdivision, the department may base its determination on documentation furnished to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs specifying the cause of death of the Armed Forces member.

(c) If a member of the Armed Forces entered active military duty while in the State of California, lived in
 this state for six months or more immediately preceding entry into active duty, and is being held as a prisoner of war or has been designated by the Armed Forces as missing in action, that person is a veteran for purposes of this article, and their spouse may file an application, is entitled to the same rights, privileges, and benefits, and may contract with the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 76.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

987.59.
